Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4006
Validity of power of attorney.

(1) A power of attorney
executed in this state on or after January 1, 2013, is valid if its execution
complies with section 30-4005. The county court and the district court of
the principal's domicile shall have concurrent jurisdiction to determine the
validity and enforceability of a power of attorney.

(2) A power of attorney
executed in this state before January 1, 2013, is valid if its execution complied
with the law of this state as it existed at the time of execution.

(3) A power of attorney
executed other than in this state is valid in this state if, when the power
of attorney was executed, the execution complied with:

(a) The law of the jurisdiction
that determines the meaning and effect of the power of attorney pursuant to
section 30-4007; or

(b)
The requirements for a military power of attorney pursuant to 10 U.S.C. 1044b,
as amended.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided by statute other than the Nebraska Uniform Power
of Attorney Act, a photocopy or electronically transmitted copy of an original
power of attorney has the same effect as the original.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 6.